Utah statutes.
78B-4-202.   Equine and livestock activity liability limitations.

(1)  It shall be presumed that participants in equine or livestock activities are aware of and understand that there are inherent risks associated with these activities.

(2)  An equine activity sponsor, equine professional, livestock activity sponsor, or livestock professional is not liable for an injury to or the death of a participant due to the inherent risks associated with these activities, unless the sponsor or professional:

(a) (i)  provided the equipment or tack;

(ii)  the equipment or tack caused the injury; and

(iii)  the equipment failure was due to the sponsor's or professional's negligence;

(b)  failed to make reasonable efforts to determine whether the equine or livestock could behave in a manner consistent with the activity with the participant;

(c)  owns, leases, rents, or is in legal possession and control of land or facilities upon which the participant sustained injuries because of a dangerous condition which was known to or should have been known to the sponsor or professional and for which warning signs have not been conspicuously posted;

(d) (i)  commits an act or omission that constitutes negligence, gross negligence, or willful or wanton disregard for the safety of the participant; and

(ii)  that act or omission causes the injury; or

(e)  intentionally injures or causes the injury to the participant.

(3)  This chapter does not prevent or limit the liability of an equine activity sponsor, an equine professional, a livestock activity sponsor, or a livestock professional who is:

(a)  a veterinarian licensed under Title 58, Chapter 28, Veterinary Practice Act, in an action to recover for damages incurred in the course of providing professional treatment of an equine;

(b)  liable under Title 4, Chapter 25, Estrays and Trespassing Animals; or

(c)  liable under Title 78B, Chapter 7, Utah Product Liability Act.

